California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, a change in ownership shall not include a transfer of a floating home marina to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, limited equity stock cooperative, or other entity formed by the tenants of a floating home marina for the purpose of purchasing the floating home marina, provided that the individual tenants who were renting at least 51 percent of the berths in the floating home marina prior to the transfer participate in the transaction through the ownership of an aggregate of at least 51 percent of the voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity that acquires the floating home marina.

(b) (1) If the transfer of a floating home marina has been
 excluded from a change in ownership pursuant to subdivision (a) and the floating home marina has not been converted to condominium, stock cooperative ownership, or limited equity cooperative ownership, any transfer of shares of the voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity that acquired the floating home marina in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be a change in ownership of a pro rata portion of the real property of the floating home marina, unless the transfer is for the purpose of converting the floating home marina to condominium, stock cooperative ownership, or limited equity cooperative ownership, or is excluded from change in ownership by Section 62, 63, 63.1, or 63.2.

(2) A floating home marina that does not utilize recorded deeds to transfer ownership interest in the berths shall file, by February 1 of each year, a report with the county assessor’s office containing all of the following
 information:

(A) The full name and mailing address of each owner, stock holder, or holder of an ownership interest in the floating home marina.

(B) The situs address, including berth number and dock, of each unit.

(C) The date the ownership interest was acquired.

(D) The Department of Housing and Community Development decal number or serial number, or both.

(3) Within 30 days of a change in ownership, the new resident owner or other purchaser or transferee of a floating home within a floating home marina that does not utilize recorded deeds to transfer ownership interest in the berths, shall file a change in ownership statement described in either Section 480 or 480.2.

(c) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall apply:

(1) “Floating home marina” has the same meaning as defined in Section 800.4 of the Civil Code.

(2) “Pro rata portion of the real property” means the total real property of the floating home marina multiplied by a fraction consisting of the number of shares of voting stock, or other ownership or membership interests, transferred divided by the total number of outstanding issued or unissued shares of voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity that acquired the floating home marina in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 312, Sec. 2.   (SB 890)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

62.11.

Change in ownership does not include the recordation of a certificate of sale pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 729.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure, relating to property sold subject to the right of redemption, for the period in which the right of redemption exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

63.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, a change of ownership shall not include any interspousal transfer, including, but not limited to:

(a) Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a spouse, or the surviving spouse of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of such a trust to the spouse of the trustor,

(b) Transfers which take effect upon the death of a spouse,

(c) Transfers to a spouse or former spouse in connection with a property settlement agreement or decree of dissolution of a marriage or legal separation, or 

(d) The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between spouses, of any coowner’s interest.

(e) The distribution of a legal entity’s property to a spouse or former spouse in exchange for the interest of such spouse in the legal entity in connection with a property settlement agreement or a decree of dissolution of a marriage or legal separation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1141, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

63.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a change in ownership shall not include the following purchases or transfers for which a claim is filed pursuant to this section:

(1) (A) The purchase or transfer of real property which is the principal residence of an eligible transferor in the case of a purchase or transfer between parents and their children.

(B) A purchase or transfer of a principal residence from a foster child to the child’s biological parent shall not be excluded under subparagraph (A) if the transferor child received that principal residence, or interest therein, from a foster parent
 through a purchase or transfer that was excluded under subparagraph (A).

(2) The purchase or transfer of the first one million dollars ($1,000,000) of full cash value of all other real property of an eligible transferor in the case of a purchase or transfer between parents and their children.

(3) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the purchase or transfer of real property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) occurring on or after March 27, 1996, between grandparents and their grandchild or grandchildren, if all of the parents of that grandchild or those grandchildren, who qualify as the children of the grandparents, are deceased as of the date of purchase or transfer. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the lien date for the
 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, in determining whether “all of the parents of that grandchild or those grandchildren, who qualify as the children of the grandparents, are deceased as of the date of purchase or transfer,” a son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the grandparent that is a stepparent to the grandchild need not be deceased on the date of the transfer.

(B) A purchase or transfer of a principal residence shall not be excluded pursuant to subparagraph (A) if the transferee grandchild or grandchildren also received a principal residence, or interest therein, through another purchase or transfer that was excludable pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The full cash value of any real property, other than a principal residence, that was transferred to the grandchild or grandchildren pursuant to a purchase or
 transfer that was excludable pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and the full cash value of a principal residence that fails to qualify for exclusion as a result of the preceding sentence shall be included in applying, for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the one million dollar ($1,000,000) full cash value limit specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(b) (1) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), “principal residence” means a dwelling that is eligible for a homeowners’ exemption or a disabled veterans’ exemption as a result of the transferor’s ownership and occupation of the dwelling. “Principal residence” includes only that portion of the land underlying the residence that consists of an area of reasonable size that is used as a site for the residence.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the one-million-dollar ($1,000,000) exclusion shall apply separately to each eligible transferor with respect to all purchases by and transfers to eligible transferees on and after November 6, 1986, of real property, other than the principal residence, of that eligible transferor. The exclusion shall not apply to any property in which the eligible transferor’s interest was received through a transfer, or transfers, excluded from change in ownership by the provisions of either subdivision (f) of Section 62 or subdivision (b) of Section 65, unless the transferor qualifies as an original transferor under subdivision (b) of Section 65. In the case of any purchase or transfer subject to this paragraph involving two or more eligible transferors, the transferors may elect to combine their separate one-million-dollar
 ($1,000,000) exclusions and, upon making that election, the combined amount of their separate exclusions shall apply to any property jointly sold or transferred by the electing transferors, provided that in no case shall the amount of full cash value of real property of any one eligible transferor excluded under this election exceed the amount of the transferor’s separate unused exclusion on the date of the joint sale or transfer.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Purchase or transfer between parents and their children” means either a transfer from a parent or parents to a child or children of the parent or parents or a transfer from a child or children to a parent or parents of the child or children. For purposes of this section, the date of any transfer between parents and their children
 under a will or intestate succession shall be the date of the decedent’s death, if the decedent died on or after November 6, 1986.

(2) “Purchase or transfer of real property between grandparents and their grandchild or grandchildren” means a purchase or transfer on or after March 27, 1996, from a grandparent or grandparents to a grandchild or grandchildren if all of the parents of that grandchild or those grandchildren who qualify as the children of the grandparents are deceased as of the date of the transfer. For purposes of this section, the date of any transfer between grandparents and their grandchildren under a will or by intestate succession shall be the date of the decedent’s death. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the lien date for the 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, in determining whether
 “all of the parents of that grandchild or those grandchildren, who qualify as the children of the grandparents, are deceased as of the date of purchase or transfer,” a son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the grandparent that is a stepparent to the grandchild need not be deceased on the date of the transfer.

(3) “Children” means any of the following:

(A) Any child born of the parent or parents, except a child, as defined in subparagraph (D), who has been adopted by another person or persons.

(B) Any stepchild of the parent or parents and the spouse of that stepchild while the relationship of stepparent and stepchild exists. For purposes of this paragraph, the relationship of stepparent and stepchild shall be deemed to exist
 until the marriage on which the relationship is based is terminated by divorce, or, if the relationship is terminated by death, until the remarriage of the surviving stepparent.

(C) Any son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the parent or parents. For the purposes of this paragraph, the relationship of parent and son-in-law or daughter-in-law shall be deemed to exist until the marriage on which the relationship is based is terminated by divorce, or, if the relationship is terminated by death, until the remarriage of the surviving son-in-law or daughter-in-law.

(D) Any child adopted by the parent or parents pursuant to statute, other than an individual adopted after reaching 18 years of age.

(E) Any foster child of a
 state-licensed foster parent, if that child was not, because of a legal barrier, adopted by the foster parent or foster parents before the child aged out of the foster care system. For purposes of this paragraph, the relationship between a foster child and foster parent shall be deemed to exist until terminated by death. However, for purposes of a transfer that occurs on the date of death, the relationship shall be deemed to exist on the date of death.

(4) “Grandchild” or “grandchildren” means any child or children of the child or children of the grandparent or grandparents.

(5) “Full cash value” means full cash value, as defined in Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and Section 110.1, with any adjustments authorized by those sections, and
 the full value of any new construction in progress, determined as of the date immediately prior to the date of a purchase by or transfer to an eligible transferee of real property subject to this section.

(6) “Eligible transferor” means a grandparent, parent, or child of an eligible transferee.

(7) “Eligible transferee” means a parent, child, or grandchild of an eligible transferor.

(8) “Real property” means real property as defined in Section 104. Real property does not include any interest in a legal entity. For purposes of this section, real property includes any of the following:

(A) An interest in a unit or lot within a cooperative housing corporation,
 as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61.

(B) A pro rata ownership interest in a mobilehome park, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(C) A pro rata ownership in a floating home marina, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 62.5.

(9) “Transfer” includes, and is not limited to, any transfer of the present beneficial ownership of property from an eligible transferor to an eligible transferee through the medium of an inter vivos or testamentary trust.

(10) “Social security number” also includes a taxpayer identification number issued by the Internal Revenue Service in the case in which the taxpayer is a foreign national who cannot obtain a
 social security number.

(d) (1) The exclusions provided for in subdivision (a) shall not be allowed unless the eligible transferee, the transferee’s legal representative, the trustee of the transferee’s trust, or the executor or administrator of the transferee’s estate files a claim with the assessor for the exclusion sought and furnishes to the assessor each of the following:

(A) A written certification by the transferee, the transferee’s legal representative, the trustee of the transferee’s trust, or the executor or administrator of the transferee’s estate, signed and made under penalty of perjury that the transferee is a parent, child, or grandchild of the transferor and that the transferor is the parent, child, or grandparent of the transferee. In the case of a grandparent-grandchild
 transfer, the written certification shall also include a certification that all the parents of the grandchild or grandchildren who qualify as children of the grandparents were deceased as of the date of the purchase or transfer and that the grandchild or grandchildren did or did not receive a principal residence excludable under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) from the deceased parents, and that the grandchild or grandchildren did or did not receive real property other than a principal residence excludable under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) from the deceased parents. The claimant shall provide legal substantiation of any matter certified pursuant to this subparagraph at the request of the county assessor.

(B) A written certification by the transferor, the transferor’s legal representative, the trustee of the transferor’s trust, or the executor
 or administrator of the transferor’s estate, signed and made under penalty of perjury that the transferor is a grandparent, parent, or child of the transferee and that the transferor is seeking the exclusion under this section and will not file a claim to transfer the base year value of the property under Section 69.5.

(C) A written certification shall also include either or both of the following:

(i) If the purchase or transfer of real property includes the purchase or transfer of residential real property, a certification that the residential real property is or is not the transferor’s principal residence.

(ii) If the purchase or transfer of real property includes the purchase or transfer of real property other than the
 transferor’s principal residence, a certification that other real property of the transferor that is subject to this section has or has not been previously sold or transferred to an eligible transferee, the total amount of full cash value, as defined in subdivision (c), of any real property subject to this section that has been previously sold or transferred by that transferor to eligible transferees, the location of that real property, the social security number of each eligible transferor, and the names of the eligible transferees of that property.

(D) If there are multiple transferees, the certification and signature may be made by any one of the transferees, if both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The transferee has actual knowledge that, and the certification signed
 by the transferee states that, all of the transferees are eligible transferees within the meaning of this section.

(ii) The certification is signed by the transferee as a true statement made under penalty of perjury.

(E) In the case of a transfer between a foster parent and foster child, the claim filed with the assessor shall include a certified copy of the court decision regarding the foster child status of the individual and a certified statement from the appropriate county agency stating that the foster child was not, because of a legal barrier, adopted by the foster parent or foster parents. Upon a request by the county assessor, the claimant also shall provide to the assessor legal substantiation of any matter certified under this subparagraph.

(2) If the full cash value of the real property purchased by or transferred to the transferee exceeds the permissible exclusion of the transferor or the combined permissible exclusion of the transferors, in the case of a purchase or transfer from two or more joint transferors, taking into account any previous purchases by or transfers to an eligible transferee from the same transferor or transferors, the transferee shall specify in their claim the amount and the allocation of the exclusion they are seeking. Within any appraisal unit, as determined in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 51 by the assessor of the county in which the real property is located, the exclusion shall be applied only on a pro rata basis, however, and shall not be applied to a selected portion or portions of the appraisal unit.

(e) (1) The State Board of Equalization shall design the form for claiming eligibility. Except as provided in paragraph (3), any claim under this section shall be filed:

(A) For transfers of real property between parents and their children occurring prior to September 30, 1990, within three years after the date of the purchase or transfer of real property for which the claim is filed.

(B) For transfers of real property between parents and their children occurring on or after September 30, 1990, and for the purchase or transfer of real property between grandparents and their grandchildren occurring on or after March 27, 1996, within three years after the date of the purchase or transfer of real property for
 which the claim is filed, or prior to transfer of the real property to a third party, whichever is earlier.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), a claim shall be deemed to be timely filed if it is filed within six months after the date of mailing of a notice of supplemental or escape assessment, issued as a result of the purchase or transfer of real property for which the claim is filed.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1),
 and subject to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a claim shall be deemed to be timely filed within three years after the date of mailing of a notice of supplemental or escape assessment, issued as a result of transfer of real property for which the claim is filed, when all of the following apply:

(i) The assessor reassesses the property, pursuant to Section 170, as a result of that property being damaged or destroyed by the 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a
 state of emergency.

(ii) The assessor issued a supplemental or escape assessment on or after the date of the state of emergency described in paragraph (A) as a result of a purchase or transfer of the real property for which the claim is filed that occurred before the date of the fire, and for which no instrument evidencing a change in ownership of the real property was recorded.

(iii) The transferee acquires ownership of the property, including, but not limited to, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13600) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Probate Code, on or after the date of the state of emergency described in paragraph (A).

(B) This paragraph shall only apply to claims filed before January 1, 2031.

(3) In the case in which the real property subject to purchase or transfer has not been transferred to a third party, a claim for exclusion under this section that is filed subsequent to the expiration of the filing periods set forth in paragraph (1) shall be considered by the assessor, subject to all of the following conditions:

(A) Any exclusion granted pursuant to that claim shall apply commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed.

(B) Under any exclusion granted pursuant to that claim, the adjusted full cash value of the subject real property in the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) shall be the adjusted base year value of the subject real property in the assessment year in which the excluded purchase or transfer took place, factored to the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) for both of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any
 subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property.

(4) (A) Unless otherwise expressly provided, the provisions of this subdivision shall apply to any purchase or transfer of real property that occurred on or after November 6, 1986.

(B) Paragraph (2) shall apply to purchases or transfers between parents and their children that occurred on or after November 6, 1986, and to purchases or transfers between grandparents and their grandchildren that occurred on or after March 27, 1996.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, a transfer of real property to a parent or child of the transferor shall not be considered a transfer to a third party.

(f) The assessor may report quarterly to the State Board of Equalization all purchases or transfers, other than purchases or transfers involving a principal residence, for which a claim for exclusion is made pursuant to subdivision (d). Each report shall contain the assessor’s parcel number for each parcel for which the exclusion is claimed, the amount of each exclusion claimed, the social security number of each eligible transferor, and any other information the board may require in order to monitor the one-million-dollar ($1,000,000) limitation in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). In recognition of the state and local interests served by the action made optional in this subdivision, the Legislature encourages the assessor to continue taking the action formerly mandated by this subdivision.

(g) This section shall apply to both voluntary
 transfers and transfers resulting from a court order or judicial decree. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as conflicting with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or the general principle that transfers by reason of death occur at the time of death.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall apply to purchases and transfers of real property completed on or after November 6, 1986, and shall not be effective for any change in ownership, including a change in ownership arising on the date of a decedent’s death, that occurred prior to that date.

(2) This section shall apply to purchases or transfers of real property between grandparents and their grandchildren occurring on or after March 27, 1996, and, with respect to purchases or transfers
 of real property between grandparents and their grandchildren, shall not be effective for any change in ownership, including a change in ownership arising on the date of a decedent’s death, that occurred prior to that date.

(i) A claim filed under this section is not a public document and is not subject to public inspection, except that a claim shall be available for inspection by the transferee and the transferor or their respective spouse, the transferee’s legal representative, the transferor’s legal representative, the trustee of the transferee’s trust, the trustee of the transferor’s trust, and the executor or administrator of the transferee’s or transferor’s estate.

(j) (1) If the assessor notifies the transferee in writing of potential eligibility for
 exclusion from change in ownership under this section, a certified claim for exclusion shall be filed with the assessor within 45 days of the date of the notice of potential eligibility. If a certified claim for exclusion is not filed within 45 days, the assessor may send a second notice of potential eligibility for exclusion, notifying the transferee that a certified claim for exclusion has not been received and that reassessment of the property will commence unless a certified claim for exclusion is filed within 60 days of the date of the second notice of potential eligibility. The second notice of potential eligibility shall indicate whether a certified claim for exclusion that is not filed within 60 days will be subject to a processing fee as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) If a certified claim for exclusion is not filed within 60 days of
 the date of the second notice of potential eligibility and an eligible transferee subsequently files a claim and qualifies for the exclusion, the assessor may, upon authorization by a county board of supervisors, require an eligible transferee to pay a one-time processing fee, collected at the time the claim is submitted, and reimbursed by the assessor if the claim is ineligible. The fee shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and shall not exceed the amount of the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the assessor for reassessment work done due to failure to file the claim for exclusion or one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), whichever is less.

(3) The failure to file a certified claim for exclusion within the filing periods specified
 by this subdivision shall not be construed to limit any exclusion from being granted pursuant to a claim filed within the filing periods specified by subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   (SB 293)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

63.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, beginning on and after February 16, 2021, a change in ownership shall not include, in whole or in part, any of the following purchases or transfers for which a claim is filed:

(1) The purchase or transfer of real property that is the principal residence of an eligible transferor in the case of a purchase or transfer between parents and their children or between grandparents and their grandchildren, if all of the parents, other than stepparents, of that grandchild or those grandchildren, who qualify as the children of the grandparents, are deceased as of the date of purchase or transfer.

(A) The transfer is required to be of a principal residence of the transferor, and become the principal residence of the transferee within one year of the transfer.

(B) The transferee shall file for the homeowners’ or disabled veterans’ exemption within a year of the transfer, and the exclusion shall be removed on the date an eligible transferee, or a subsequent eligible transferee who files for the homeowners’ or disabled veterans’ exemption within one year, is no longer eligible for either the homeowners’ or disabled veterans’ exemption.

(C) If applicable, as of the lien date immediately following the date the eligible transferee or subsequent eligible transferee no longer qualifies for the exclusion provided by this section, the base year value established as of the change in
 ownership date to which the exclusion applied, adjusted annually in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51, shall be enrolled.

(2) The purchase or transfer is of a family farm of an eligible transferor in the case of a purchase or transfer between parents and their children or between grandparents and their grandchildren, if all of the parents, other than stepparents, of that grandchild or those grandchildren, who qualify as the children of the grandparents, are deceased as of the date of purchase or transfer.

(A) This exclusion shall apply separately to the transfer of each legal parcel that makes up a family farm.

(B) For purposes of this section, each legal parcel that makes up a family farm
 shall be deemed to itself be a family farm, except for a legal parcel containing a family home.

(C) A legal parcel containing a family home as described in subparagraph (B) may qualify separately for exclusion under paragraph (1).

(b) The exclusions provided for in this section shall not be allowed unless a claim for the exclusion sought, pursuant to subdivision (f), is filed with the assessor.

(c) A claim filed under this section is not a public document and is not subject to public inspection, except that a claim shall be available for inspection by the transferee and the transferor or their respective spouse, the transferee’s legal representative, the transferor’s legal representative, the trustee of the transferee’s trust,
 the trustee of the transferor’s trust, and the executor or administrator of the transferee’s or transferor’s estate.

(d) The new taxable value of the family home or family farm shall be the sum of both of the following:

(1) The taxable value of the family home or family farm as determined in accordance with Section 110.1, with the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, determined as of the date immediately prior to the date the principal residence or family farm is purchased or transferred to the transferee.

(2) The applicable of the following amounts:

(A) If the fair market value, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 110, of the family home or family farm upon purchase by, or transfer to, the transferee is less than the sum of the taxable value described in paragraph (1) plus one million dollars ($1,000,000), then zero dollars ($0).

(B) If the fair market value, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 110, of the family home or family farm upon purchase by, or transfer to, the transferee is equal to or more than the sum of the taxable value described in paragraph (1) plus one million dollars ($1,000,000), an amount equal to the fair market value of the family home upon purchase by, or transfer to, the transferee, minus the sum of the taxable value described in paragraph (1) and one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(e) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Children” means any of the following:

(A) Any child born of the parent or parents, except a child, as defined in subparagraph (D), who has been adopted by another person or persons.

(B) Any stepchild of the parent or parents and the spouse of that stepchild while the relationship of stepparent and stepchild exists. For purposes of this paragraph, the relationship of stepparent and stepchild shall be deemed to exist until the marriage on which the relationship is based is terminated by divorce, or, if the relationship is terminated by death, until the remarriage of the surviving stepparent.

(C) Any son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the parent or parents. For the purposes of this paragraph, the relationship of parent and son-in-law or daughter-in-law shall be deemed to exist until the marriage on which the relationship is based is terminated by divorce, or, if the relationship is terminated by death, until the remarriage of the surviving son-in-law or daughter-in-law.

(D) Any child adopted by the parent or parents pursuant to statute, other than an individual adopted after reaching 18 years of age.

(E) Any foster child of a state-licensed foster parent, if that child was not, because of a legal barrier, adopted by the foster parent or foster parents before the child aged out of the foster care system. For
 purposes of this paragraph, the relationship between a foster child and foster parent shall be deemed to exist until terminated by death. However, for purposes of a transfer that occurs on the date of death, the relationship shall be deemed to exist on the date of death.

(2) “Eligible transferee” means a parent, child, grandparent, or grandchild of an eligible transferor.

(3) “Eligible transferor” means a grandparent, parent, grandchild, or child of an eligible transferee.

(4) “Family farm” means any real property under cultivation or which is being used for pasture or grazing, or that is used to produce any agricultural commodity, as that term is defined in Section 51201 of the Government Code as that section read on January
 1, 2020.

(5) “Family home” or “principal place of residence” means a dwelling that is eligible for a homeowners’ exemption or a disabled veterans’ exemption as a result of the transferor’s ownership and occupation of the dwelling. “Family home” or “principal residence” includes only that portion of the land underlying the residence that consists of an area of reasonable size that is used as a site for the residence.

(6) “Full cash value” means full cash value, as defined in Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and Section 110.1, with any adjustments authorized by those sections, and the full value of any new construction in progress, determined as of the date immediately prior to the date of a purchase by or transfer to an eligible
 transferee of real property subject to this section.

(7) “Grandchild” or “grandchildren” means any child or children of the child or children of the grandparent or grandparents.

(8) “Real property” means real property as defined in Section 104. Real property does not include any interest in a legal entity. For purposes of this section, real property includes any of the following:

(A) An interest in a unit or lot within a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 61.

(B) A pro rata ownership interest in a mobilehome park, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(C) A
 pro rata ownership in a floating home marina, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 62.5.

(9) “Transfer” includes, and is not limited to, any transfer of the present beneficial ownership of property from an eligible transferor to an eligible transferee through the medium of an inter vivos or testamentary trust.

(f) (1) The State Board of Equalization shall prescribe, after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, a form for claiming eligibility. Except as provided in paragraph (3), any claim under this section shall be filed as follows:

(A) Within three years after the date of the purchase or transfer of real property for which the claim is filed, or prior to the transfer of the
 real property to a third party, or an eligible transferee no longer occupies the residence, whichever is earlier.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a claim shall be deemed to be timely filed if it is filed within six months after the date of mailing of a notice of supplemental or escape assessment, issued as a result of the purchase or transfer of real property for which the claim is filed.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), and subject to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a claim shall be deemed to be timely filed within three years after the date of mailing of a notice of supplemental or escape assessment,
 issued as a result of transfer of real property for which the claim is filed, when all of the following apply:

(i) The assessor reassesses the property, pursuant to Section 170, as a result of that property being damaged or destroyed by the 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency.

(ii) The assessor issued a supplemental or escape assessment due to a previously unrecorded change in ownership on or after the date of the state of emergency described in paragraph (A).

(iii) The transferee acquires ownership of the property, including but not limited to, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13600) of Part 2 of
 Division 8 of the Probate Code, on or after the date of the state of emergency described in paragraph (A).

(B) If all conditions of subparagraph (A) are satisfied, and notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a filing to claim the homeowners’ or disabled veterans’ exemption shall be treated as timely if it is filed within a year of the date of mailing of a notice of supplemental or escape assessment issued as a result of the transfer of the real property for which the claim is filed.

(C) This paragraph shall only apply to claims filed before January 1, 2031.

(3) In the case in which the real property
 subject to purchase or transfer has not been transferred to a third party, a claim for exclusion under this section that is filed subsequent to the expiration of the filing periods set forth in paragraph (1) shall be considered by the assessor, subject to both of the following conditions:

(A) Any exclusion granted pursuant to that claim shall apply, commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed.

(B) Under any exclusion granted pursuant to that claim, the adjusted full cash value of the subject real property in the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) shall be the adjusted base year value of the subject real property in the assessment year in which the excluded purchase or transfer took place, factored to the assessment year
 described in subparagraph (A) for both of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property.

(g) (1) If the assessor notifies the transferee in writing of potential eligibility for exclusion from change in ownership under this section, a certified claim for exclusion shall be filed with the assessor within 45 days of the date of the notice of potential eligibility. If a certified claim for exclusion is not filed within 45 days, the assessor may send a second notice of potential eligibility for exclusion, notifying the transferee that a certified
 claim for exclusion has not been received and that reassessment of the property will commence unless a certified claim for exclusion is filed within 60 days of the date of the second notice of potential eligibility. The second notice of potential eligibility shall indicate whether a certified claim for exclusion that is not filed within 60 days will be subject to a processing fee as provided in paragraph (2).
